Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.110

Limitation of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of a dental assistant in the discharge of official duties by dental assistants in the United States federal services on federal reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs;

(2) Expanded function dental auxiliary education and training programs approved by the commission and the practice as an expanded function dental auxiliary by students in expanded function dental auxiliary education and training programs approved by the commission, when acting under the direction and supervision of persons licensed under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW;

(3) Dental assistant education and training programs, and the practice of dental assisting by students in dental assistant education and training programs approved by the commission or offered at a school approved or licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board, student achievement council, state board for community and technical colleges, or Washington state skill centers certified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, when acting under the direction and supervision of persons registered or licensed under this chapter or chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW;

(4) The practice of a volunteer dental assistant providing services under the supervision of a licensed dentist in a charitable dental clinic, as approved by the commission in rule; or

(5) The performance of dental health aide therapist services to the extent authorized under chapter 70.350 RCW.

[ 2017 c 5 s 6; 2012 c 229 s 502; 2008 c 150 s 1; 2007 c 269 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.